Maine, session 132, LD1013.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §5712-A is enacted to read:
§5712-A. Referendum required on certain government unit bonds
A municipality seeking to issue a bond in the amount of $10,000,000 or more shall call
a referendum for the voters of the municipality to approve the bond. The referendum must
be held on the first Tuesday in November. The procedure for the referendum must follow
the procedures established in section 2354 and in Title 21-A.